New Jersey, session 222, A1524.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  To the extent practicable, the New Jersey Transit Corporation shall complete development of the proposed Meadowlands Transitway project by May 1, 2026. b.  The corporation shall, by May 1, 2025, assess whether the Meadowlands Transitway project will be completed on or before May 1, 2026, as required pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  If the corporation determines that the project will not be completed by May 1, 2026, the corporation shall, by September 1, 2025, develop and make publicly available on its official Internet website a public transportation plan outlining how the corporation will meet the increased demand for transit services within the Meadowlands Sports and Entertainment Complex by May 1, 2026. c.  As used in this section, Meadowlands Transitway project means the rapid transit system that would connect the New Jersey Transit Corporations Secaucus Junction Station and the Meadowlands Sports and Entertainment Complex. The Meadowlands Transitway project does not include the BetMGM Meadowlands Rail Line that opened in 2009 and provides train shuttle service between Secaucus Junction and the Meadowlands Rail Station for certain large events. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.